test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-prootein_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - prootein: # 1B
    prootein+N+Sg+Nom: prootein
    prootein+N+Sg+Gen: prootein
    prootein+N+Sg+Acc: prootein
    prootein+N+Sg+Ill: proteinân
    prootein+N+Sg+Loc: proteinist
    prootein+N+Sg+Com: proteináin
    prootein+N+Sg+Abe: prooteinttáá
    prootein+N+Ess:    proteinin
    prootein+N+Par:    proteinid
    prootein+N+Pl+Nom: proteineh
    prootein+N+Pl+Gen: proteinij
    prootein+N+Pl+Acc: proteinijd
    prootein+N+Pl+Ill: proteináid
    prootein+N+Pl+Loc: proteinijn
    prootein+N+Pl+Com: proteinijguin
    prootein+N+Pl+Abe: proteinijttáá
